foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C11.lexc
LEXICON VkoduInf

%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ினேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ினோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ினன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ினாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ினீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ினீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ினான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ினாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ினர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ினார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ினார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ினது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+3pln%=அன:^ினன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^வேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^வோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^வாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^வீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^வீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^வான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^வாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sge%=அர்:^வர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^வார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+weak%|+fut%=வ்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^வார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ினனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^ினனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+past%=இன்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^ினனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+strong%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விினேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விினோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விினன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விினாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விினீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விினீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விினான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விினாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விினர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விினார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விினார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விினது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+past%=இன்%|+3pln%=அன:^விினன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விகிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விகிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^விகிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^விகிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^விகிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^விகிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^விகிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^விகிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^விகிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^விகிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^விகிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^விகிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^விகிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^விகின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+nonattitude%|+caus%=வி%|+pres%=கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^விகின்றோம் #;

LEXICON ClassKodu11
விழுத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
விதித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
விகண்டித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
விசனித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வருணித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வைத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வெடுவெடுத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வலத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வஞ்சித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
திமிர்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தளிர்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
துவந்தித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
துனித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தமித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தாபித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தொந்தரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தனித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தேர்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
ரமித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
மளமளத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
முனைத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
மாய்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
மொசுமொசுத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
மடித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கிளைத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கவர்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
குமிட்டித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
குடுகுடுத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கம்பீரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கெமிளித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கப்பித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கடுகடுத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கோடீகரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பிரவர்த்தித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பிரகாசித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பிசுபிசுத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
புரோட்சித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பரிவேட்டித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பரதவித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பாலித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பொருபொருத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பலித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பேர்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பூஷித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நிர்வகித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நிறத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நுகைத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நாணித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நெகிழ்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நேர்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சித்திரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சினைத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சிறக்கணித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சுளித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சும்புளித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சமித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சமாய்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
செழுசெழுத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
செந்தலித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சந்தேகித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சேர்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சங்கரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சஞ்சரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
ஒப்பித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
ஓமித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
என்பித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
இருத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
இலைச்சித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
ஆவளித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
ஆகரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
உவர்த்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
உரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
உபயோகித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
உடுத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
அவைத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
அருத்தித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
அபிநயித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
அனுசரித்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
அசைத்துக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சிறந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
துறந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
நடந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
இறந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
விரண்டுக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
துவண்டுக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
மென்றுக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தவன்றுக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சூன்றுக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கினிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
குமிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
கீழ்ந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
மலைந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
முசிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
திதைந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
துய்ந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
தேர்ந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
தவழ்ந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
சுரிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
விளிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
வசிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
பிய்ந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
பதிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
பொரிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
ஞெலிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
ஒலிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
உலைந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
நிகர்ந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
நசிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
நவிர்ந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
அழிந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
அசர்ந்துகொடு	VkoduInf;
குறாவிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
குணட்டிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
குன்றிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கம்மிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கிண்டிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கடத்திக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கருளிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கனவிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கோரிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
கூறிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வவ்விக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
விளம்பிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
விரட்டிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வீடிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வணங்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
வழண்டிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
புகுத்திக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
புதுக்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பயிற்றிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பிணக்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பசப்பிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பாந்திக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பதறிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
போற்றிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பொருமிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
முங்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
மிறுங்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
மருக்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சுற்றிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சிக்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
சீந்திக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
செருமிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
துயக்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
துன்னிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
திருக்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தாண்டிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
தோண்டிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நுணாவிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நிவறிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நீடிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நழுக்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
நொந்திக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
ஒஃகிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
எறட்டிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
உறங்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
உருகிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
இறங்கிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
இழிசிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
அம்மிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
அணாப்பிக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
அராத்திக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பட்டுக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
பெட்டுக்கொடு	VkoduInf;
